Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 431A.430 is amended to read:
431A.430. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Air conditioner” means a portable, stand-up air conditioner that has an energy efficiency
ratio rating of eight or higher.
(b)(A) “Air filter” means an air filtering device that uses a  high-efficiency particulate air
(HEPA) filter to remove contaminating particles from the air.
(B) “Air filter” does not include a device that is labeled an “air purifier” and that uses an
electrostatic or ionizing process.
(c) “Eligible distribution entity” means a:
(A) Local government as defined in ORS 174.116;
(B) Local housing authority;
(C) Nonprofit organization;
(D) Federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon;
(E) Indian health center;
(F) Coordinated care organization as defined in ORS 414.025;
(G) Community action agency as described in ORS 458.505;
(H) Manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooperative as defined in ORS 62.803;
(I) Landlord that has a residential tenant who has received medical assistance through  the
Oregon Health Authority, the Department of Human Services or Medicare within the past 12
months;
(J) Electric utility as defined in ORS 757.600; or
(K) Natural gas utility as defined in ORS 757.392.
(d) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(2)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall create a program to:
(A) Acquire a supply of air conditioners and air filters; and
(B) Distribute the air conditioners and air  filters to eligible distribution entities that will pro-
vide the air conditioners and air filters [ on an emergency basis ] for an emergency or anticipated
emergency to eligible individuals as described in subsection (4) of this section.
(b) The Oregon Health Authority may provide or contract with one or more  third parties to
administer the program.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-A) Page 1
(3) The administrator of the program shall:
(a) Determine the percentage of  program funds needed to support the costs of installation and
materials for installation.
(b) Determine the percentage of program funds, but no more than  10 percent of program funds,
needed to cover the costs  of the authority or a third party or parties and eligible distribution enti-
ties in administering the program.
(c) Make technical assistance resources available to individuals who receive  an air conditioner
or air filter under the program that answer questions  about the installation, use and maintenance
of the air conditioners and air filters.
(d) Provide [ technical assistance ] to eligible distribution entities[ ,]:
(A) Technical assistance,  including assistance that supports the  distribution, installation and
maintenance of the air conditioners and air filters[ .]; and
(B) Reimbursement for costs of identifying eligible Oregonians, delivering devices,  pro-
viding utility supports when otherwise not available and  ensuring that devices are installed
and working properly.
(4) An eligible distribution entity may distribute air conditioners and air  filters under this sec-
tion only to individuals who:
(a) Are eligible to receive medical assistance through the Oregon Health Authority, the De-
partment of  Human Services or Medicare, including under the Cover All People program estab-
lished in ORS 414.231, or have received any of these services in the past 12 months;
(b) Reside in any type of housing or recreational vehicle, as defined in ORS 174.101, that has
electricity for operating the air conditioner or air filter; and
(c) Upon receiving an air conditioner or air filter, provide an attestation that the individual  can
safely and legally install the air conditioner or air filter in  the individual’s home or recreational
vehicle.
(5) The  Oregon Health Authority shall make available a list of eligible distribution entities
participating in the program to:
(a) Individuals who are eligible to receive medical assistance  through the Oregon Health Au-
thority or Department of Human Services.
(b) The 2-1-1 system provided for in ORS 403.400 to 403.430.
(c) The Housing and Community Services Department.
(6) The Oregon Health Authority and any eligible  distribution entity participating in the pro-
gram are immune from civil liability for:
(a) The functioning, safety or impact of any air conditioner or air  filter distributed by the pro-
gram.
(b) Any heat-related health impacts to an individual using an air conditioner  or air filter dis-
tributed by the program.
(7) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules to implement the program.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 456.378 is amended to read:
456.378. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department  shall develop and implement the
Housing Choice Landlord Guarantee Program for  the purpose of providing financial assistance to
landlords to mitigate damages caused by tenants who have received rental assistance:
(a) Under the Housing Choice Voucher Program; or
(b) From a rehousing initiative under section 4, 5 or 11, chapter 15, Oregon Laws 2023.
(2) Landlords that are  eligible for assistance under the Housing Choice Landlord Guarantee
Program must submit  an application in the form and format prescribed by the department. Assist-
ance is limited to  reimbursement for only those amounts that are related to property damage, unpaid
rent or other damages:
(a) Caused by tenants described in subsection (1) of this section;
(b) That exceed normal wear and tear; and
(c) That , per tenancy,  are in excess of $500 but  not more than [ $5,000 per tenancy] a maximum
amount established by the department by rule .
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-A) Page 2
(3) A landlord must  submit an application for assistance to the department within one year fol-
lowing the later of the date that:
(a) The tenancy terminates;
(b) The landlord obtains possession of the dwelling unit; or
(c) Payments from the Housing Choice Voucher Program to the landlord terminate.
(4) The department may contract with a public  or private provider for the administration of the
Housing Choice Landlord Guarantee Program. The department is not  subject to the provisions of
ORS chapter 279A or 279B in awarding a  contract under the provisions of this subsection. The de-
partment shall establish by rule procedures for inviting proposals  and awarding contracts under this
subsection.
(5) The department  shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section, including but
not limited to prescribing additional qualifications and requirements  that must be met by landlords
and the form of application that must be submitted to the department  to receive assistance under
the program.
SECTION 3.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate February 29, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1529 (SB 1529-A) Page 3